District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-1444

Issuance and display of license.

Repealed.

July 13, 1978, D.C. Law 2-91, § 404, 24 DCR 9765
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1243(a), 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 47-1444.
1973 Ed., § 47-3319.